Missouri, session 2026, HB1868.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 575, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 575.356, to read as follows:
575.356. 1. A person commits the offense of impeding, threatening, or harassing
a first responder if such person after receiving an oral warning not to approach from an
individual that the person knows or reasonably should know is a first responder and the
individual is engaged in the lawful performance of his or her duties as a first responder
knowingly and willfully violates such warning and approaches or remains within
twenty-five feet of the first responder with the intent to:
(1) Impede or interfere with the first responder's ability to perform such duties;
(2) Threaten the first responder with physical harm; or
(3) Harass the first responder.
2. The offense of impeding, threatening, or harassing a first responder is a class
D misdemeanor.
3. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Emergency medical care provider", an ambulance driver, emergency
medical technician, paramedic, registered nurse, physician, or medical director. The
term "emergency medical care provider" also includes a physician, employee, agent, or
volunteer of a hospital as defined in section 190.100 who is employed, under contract, or
otherwise authorized by a hospital to perform duties directly associated with the care
and treatment rendered by the hospital's emergency department or the security thereof;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HBs 1868 & 3257 2
(2) "First responder", a law enforcement officer as defined in section 556.061, a
parole or probation officer, a firefighter as defined in section 87.120, or an emergency
medical care provider;
(3) "Harass", to willfully engage in a course of conduct directed at a first
responder that intentionally causes substantial emotional distress in that first responder
and serves no legitimate purpose.
✔